Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.050

Appointment of members—Terms, travel expenses.

(1) The director shall appoint the producer members of the commission. In making appointments, no later than ninety days before an expiration of a commission member's term, the director shall call for recommendations for commission member positions, and the director shall take into consideration recommendations made by a statewide Washington state craft brewing trade association or other producers. In appointing persons to the commission, the director shall seek a balanced representation on the commission that reflects the composition of the beer producers throughout the state on the basis of beer produced and geographic location. Information on beer production by geographic location shall be provided by the commission upon the director's request.

(2) If a position on the commission becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the commission shall notify the director and the unexpired term shall immediately be filled by appointment by the director.

(3) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter as defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule, reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2011 c 54 s 3; 2006 c 330 s 6.]